Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 18. Public Lands and Donations

§ 1. Acceptance of lands from United States; sale of such lands.

The State of Wyoming hereby agrees to accept the grants of lands heretofore made, or that may hereafter be made by the United States to the state, for educational purposes, for public buildings and institutions and for other objects, and donations of money with the conditions and limitations that may be imposed by the act or acts of congress, making such grants or donations. Such lands shall be disposed of only at public auction to the highest responsible bidder, after having been duly appraised by the land commissioners, at not less than three-fourths the appraised value thereof, and for not less than $10 per acre; provided, that in the case of actual and bona fide settlement and improvement thereon at the time of the adoption of this constitution, such actual settler shall have the preference right to purchase the land whereon he may have settled, not exceeding 160 acres at a sum not less than the appraised value thereof, and in making such appraisement the value of improvements shall not be taken into consideration. If, at any time hereafter, the United States shall grant any arid lands in the state to the state, on the condition that the state reclaim and dispose of them to actual settlers, the legislature shall be authorized to accept such arid lands on such conditions, or other conditions, if the same are practicable and reasonable.

Cross references. —

As to public lands generally, see title 36.

Section does not limit sovereign right of United States. —

This section does not suggest a limitation of sovereign right of the United States to acquire these lands for less than $10 per acre if needed in exercise of governmental functions. United States v. 2902 Acres of Land, 49 F. Supp. 595, 1943 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2699 (D. Wyo. 1943).

Lands granted to state university. —

Control and disposition of lands granted to the state university lie in board of land commissioners. Ross v. Trustees of Univ., 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Rights-of-way. —

The legislature may grant rights-of-way across university lands. Ross v. Trustees of Univ. of Wyo., 30 Wyo. 433, 222 P. 3,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Water rights. —

Board of control had jurisdiction to adjudicate water rights. State ex rel. Mitchell Irrigation Dist. v. Parshall, 22 Wyo. 318, 140 P. 830,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1914).

Use of land for pipeline. —

Grant of use of land for pipeline purposes only, to which plaintiff subsequently obtained a patent, was not a “disposition of the land.” Richardson v. Midwest Ref. Co., 39 Wyo. 58, 270 P. 154,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1928).

Where the state retains an interest in land upon which a purchaser enters under a contract of purchase,

such land may not be assessed for taxes as such, though the purchaser's interest may be assessed; a sale of the property for delinquent taxes might indirectly destroy the state's interest and violate the provisions of this section. Olds v. Little Horse Creek Cattle Co., 22 Wyo. 336, 140 P. 1004,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1914).

Lease is not a disposal. —

Lease of state lands as authorized by the Wyoming Constitution is not a disposal of those lands and need not be accomplished by public auction. Riedel v. Anderson, 2003 WY 70, 70 P.3d 223,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2003).

Exchange of school lands. —

A sale and an exchange are two different concepts with different legal significance attached to each. What Wyoming's framers intended when they required a public auction for a sale of school lands was to prevent school lands from being exploited for private advantage, but there is no need to read the these Constitutional clauses to impose the same restrictions on transfers in which the abuses they were intended to prevent are not likely to occur. Dir. of the Office of State Lands & Invs. v. Merbanco, Inc., 2003 WY 73, 70 P.3d 241,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. July 10, 2003).

A sale and an exchange are two different concepts with different legal significance attached to each; otherwise, the words would be synonyms for each other with no legal difference. What Wyoming's framers intended when they required a public auction for a sale of school lands was to prevent school lands from being exploited for private advantage, and there was no need to read these constitutional clauses to impose the same restrictions on transfers in which the abuses they were intended to prevent were not likely to occur, and in which the trust may in another and more effective fashion be assured full compensation. Therefore, it could not be concluded that the framers of the Wyoming Constitution intended a public auction must occur before the state can exchange school lands for lands of equal value. Dir. of the Office of State Lands & Invs. v. Merbanco, Inc., 2003 WY 73, 70 P.3d 241,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. July 10, 2003).

Renewal of lease. —

Right of renewal of a lease on school land was not a vested right as against one claiming a preference right. State ex rel. Huckfeldt v. State Bd. of Sch. Land Comm'rs, 20 Wyo. 162, 122 P. 94,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1912).

By the use of the term “renewal” the legislature did not intend to give a preferential right upon the identical terms and conditions of old lease, but old lessee must meet all reasonable terms and conditions laid down from time to time by the board which other persons are willing to meet, making the lease not a continuing one in violation of the enabling act and the constitution but a new one. Wyodak Chem. Co. v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 51 Wyo. 265, 65 P.2d 1103,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1937).

Supreme court's duty. —

It is bounden duty of supreme court, insofar as possible, to carry provisions that permanent school funds shall remain forever inviolate and undiminished into force and effect. Alamo Drainage Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 60 Wyo. 177, 148 P.2d 229,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1944).

Quoted

in

Mayor v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 64 Wyo. 409, 192 P.2d 403,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1948); Wyoming v. United States, 310 F.2d 566,

1962 U.S. App. LEXIS 3929

(10th Cir. 1962); Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Kerrigan v. Miller, 53 Wyo. 441, 84 P.2d 724,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1938).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming School Trust Lands Trapped Inside Grand Teton National Park — Alternative Solutions for the Commissioner of Public Lands,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1985).

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

§ 2. Application of proceeds of sale or rental.

The proceeds from the sale and rental of all lands and other property donated, granted or received, or that may hereafter be donated, granted or received, from the United States or any other source, shall be inviolably appropriated and applied to the specific purposes specified in the original grant or gifts.

Bequests. —

Where property is bequeathed to the state with an annual income payable to a legatee out of income, the property cannot be considered “not otherwise appropriated” and must be added to the common school fund. Bond v. State, 45 Wyo. 133, 16 P.2d 53,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1932).

Higgins Memorial Foundation. —

Chapter 157, Laws 1929, establishing Higgins Memorial Foundation, was unconstitutional insofar as it affected the use and disposition of the property bequeathed and charged the same with an annuity. Bond v. State, 45 Wyo. 133, 16 P.2d 53,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1932).

Lands granted to state university. —

Control and disposition of lands granted to the state university lie in board of land commissioners. Ross v. Trustees of Univ., 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Rights-of-way. —

The legislature is not prohibited from authorizing board of land commissioners to grant right-of-way across university lands. Ross v. Trustees of Univ. of Wyo., 30 Wyo. 433, 222 P. 3,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

University permanent land fund was not intended to be confined for use

in payment of current expenses but may, if necessary and proper, be used to erect buildings when authorized by legislature. Arnold v. Bond, 47 Wyo. 236, 34 P.2d 28,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1934).

Contract with an expert to investigate leases of state lands and ascertain if correct accounting was being made,

and if not to assist in recovering amount due state on contingent basis, is not violative of constitution as depleting the school funds, as the moneys so recovered are a new fund brought into existence through the investigation. Bourne v. Cole, 53 Wyo. 31, 77 P.2d 617,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1938).

Quoted

in

Mayor v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 64 Wyo. 409, 192 P.2d 403,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1948).

Riedel v. Anderson, 2003 WY 70, 70 P.3d 223,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

State v. Underwood, 54 Wyo. 1, 86 P.2d 707,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1939).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming School Trust Lands Trapped Inside Grand Teton National Park — Alternative Solutions for the Commissioner of Public Lands,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1985).

§ 3. Board of land commissioners.

The governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, state auditor and superintendent of public instruction shall constitute a board of land commissioners, which under direction of the legislature as limited by this constitution, shall have direction, control, leasing and disposal of lands of the state granted, or which may be hereafter granted for the support and benefit of public schools, subject to the further limitations that the sale of all lands shall be at public auction, after such delay (not less than the time fixed by congress) in portions at proper intervals of time, and at such minimum prices (not less than the minimum fixed by congress) as to realize the largest possible proceeds. And said board, subject to the limitations of this constitution and under such regulations as may be provided by law shall have the direction, control, disposition and care of all lands that have been heretofore or may hereafter be granted to the state. (As amended by Laws 1921, Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, p. 293.)

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning board of land commissioners, see §§

36-2-101

to

36-2-210

.

Discretion of board. —

In leasing state lands, board exercises wide discretion which should be controlling except in case of illegal exercise thereof, or fraud or grave abuse of such discretion. Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

The discretion of the board in both the leasing and the sale of school lands of this state has been given a very broad scope, subject only to the limitation that review by the courts may be had of its action in the event of the board's transgression of provisions of positive law, fraud or having committed a grave abuse of that discretion. Whether the board has exceeded this limitation must be determined from the varying circumstances of individual cases. Mayor v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 64 Wyo. 409, 192 P.2d 403,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 64 Wyo. 430, 195 P.2d 752 (Wyo. 1948).

“Under direction of the legislature as limited by this constitution” construed. —

The constitution which creates the board of land commissioners grants broad authority which is to be exercised “under direction of the legislature as limited by this constitution.” Under this provision, the legislature is authorized to establish rules and methods which will govern the board within constitutional limits, but any statutes passed under this authority must if effective to control a controverted point be clear and definite. When there is no such direction the board must exercise its best judgment with which the courts may not interfere except in cases of illegal exercise of discretion, or fraud. Mahoney v. L. L. Sheep Co., 79 Wyo. 293, 333 P.2d 712,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1958).

Board has control of all state lands.

State ex rel. Walls v. State Bd. of Land Comm'rs, 36 Wyo. 302, 254 P. 491,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1927).

Constitution invests the board under such regulations as may be provided by law with the direction, control, disposition and care of all state lands. State ex rel. Marsh v. State Land Comm'rs, 7 Wyo. 478, 53 P. 292,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1898); Bucknum v. Johnson, 21 Wyo. 26, 127 P. 904,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1912).

Lease of state lands. —

Board of land commissioners is only authority vested with power to lease state lands. Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

Under this section and §

36-2-101

, constitutional and statutory authority is granted to the board of land commissioners to lease lands of the state. Reese v. Bruegger Ranches, 463 P.2d 23,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1969).

Mineral land leases. —

Board of land commissioners or their employees must ascertain the amounts due state under mineral land leases, and that duty cannot be delegated by contract to others nor can they confer discretionary powers upon such parties, or agree to pay them out of funds in the hands of the board, as the board has no authority to disburse such funds, but must deposit them in the state treasury. MacDougall v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 48 Wyo. 493, 49 P.2d 663,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1935).

Lease of school lands. —

Contention that when an applicant for the lease of state school lands, who is in all respects qualified to hold it as a renewal lessee, presents his application for such a lease to the board, that that body must grant the lease and may not under any circumstances decline to issue it to him, could not be sustained. Mayor v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 64 Wyo. 409, 192 P.2d 403,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 64 Wyo. 430, 195 P.2d 752 (Wyo. 1948).

The provisions of law in §

36-5-105

, relating to preferences in granting leases of state lands, become binding upon the board if and when it decides to lease school lands. Mayor v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 64 Wyo. 409, 192 P.2d 403,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 64 Wyo. 430, 195 P.2d 752 (Wyo. 1948).

Exchange of school lands. —

A sale and an exchange are two different concepts with different legal significance attached to each. What Wyoming's framers intended when they required a public auction for a sale of school lands was to prevent school lands from being exploited for private advantage, but there is no need to read the these Constitutional clauses to impose the same restrictions on transfers in which the abuses they were intended to prevent are not likely to occur. Dir. of the Office of State Lands & Invs. v. Merbanco, Inc., 2003 WY 73, 70 P.3d 241,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. July 10, 2003).

A sale and an exchange are two different concepts with different legal significance attached to each; otherwise, the words would be synonyms for each other with no legal difference. What Wyoming's framers intended when they required a public auction for a sale of school lands was to prevent school lands from being exploited for private advantage, and there was no need to read these constitutional clauses to impose the same restrictions on transfers in which the abuses they were intended to prevent were not likely to occur, and in which the trust may in another and more effective fashion be assured full compensation. Therefore, it could not be concluded that the framers of the Wyoming Constitution intended a public auction must occur before the state can exchange school lands for lands of equal value. Dir. of the Office of State Lands & Invs. v. Merbanco, Inc., 2003 WY 73, 70 P.3d 241,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. July 10, 2003).

Lands granted to state university. —

Control and disposition of lands granted to the state university lie in board of land commissioners. Ross v. Trustees of Univ., 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Rights-of-way. —

The legislature may grant rights-of-way across university lands. Ross v. Trustees of Univ. of Wyo., 30 Wyo. 433, 222 P. 3,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

University permanent land fund was not intended to be confined for use

in payment of current expenses but may, if necessary and proper, be used to erect buildings when authorized by legislature. Arnold v. Bond, 47 Wyo. 236, 34 P.2d 28,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1934).

Mandamus. —

Letting of a lease cannot be controlled by mandamus. State ex rel. Marsh v. State Land Comm'rs, 7 Wyo. 478, 53 P. 292,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1898).

Judicial review. —

Trial de novo mentioned in §

36-2-206

is limited to a determination on the part of the district court of whether, on the facts proved, there was “an illegal exercise” of board's discretion, fraud, or “grave abuse of such discretion.” Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

Where board in exercising its discretionary power leased state lands to qualified corporation holding expired lease and neither exercised its discretion illegally nor gravely abused it, and no fraud is proved, land board action must be affirmed. Banzhaf v. Swan Co., 60 Wyo. 201, 148 P.2d 225,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1944).

Applied

in

McGuire v. McGuire, 608 P.2d 1278,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1980).

Quoted

in

Riedel v. Anderson, 2003 WY 70, 70 P.3d 223,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2003).

Stated

in

L.L. Sheep Co. v. Potter, 67 Wyo. 348, 224 P.2d 496,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1950).

Cited

in

Reid v. Filmore, 12 Wyo. 72, 73 P. 849,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1903); State v. Underwood, 54 Wyo. 1, 86 P.2d 707,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1939); In re Hagood, 356 P.2d 135,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1960).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Rights of Way to Mining Claims Across Public Lands,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 162 (1958).

For comment, “Wyoming School Trust Lands Trapped Inside Grand Teton National Park — Alternative Solutions for the Commissioner of Public Lands,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1985).

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 4. Legislature to provide for disposition of lands.

The legislature shall enact the necessary laws for the sale, disposal, leasing or care of all lands that have been or may hereafter be granted to the state, and shall, at the earliest practicable period, provide by law for the location and selection of all lands that have been or may hereafter be granted by congress to the state, and shall pass laws for the suitable keeping, transfer and disbursement of the land grant funds, and shall require of all officers charged with the same or the safekeeping thereof to give ample bonds for all moneys and funds received by them.

Cross references. —

As to leasing state lands generally, see §§

36-5-101

to

36-5-117

.

As to sale of state lands, see §§

36-9-101

to

36-9-120

.

Lands granted to state university. —

Control and disposition of lands granted to the state university lie in board of land commissioners. Ross v. Trustees of Univ., 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Rights-of-way. —

The legislature is not prohibited from authorizing board of land commissioners to grant rights-of-way across university lands. Ross v. Trustees of Univ. of Wyo., 30 Wyo. 433, 222 P. 3,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

University permanent land fund was not intended to be confined for use

in payment of current expenses but may, if necessary and proper, be used to erect buildings when authorized by legislature. Arnold v. Bond, 47 Wyo. 236, 34 P.2d 28,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1934).

Quoted

in

Wyoming v. United States, 310 F.2d 566, 1962 U.S. App. LEXIS 3929 (10th Cir. 1962).

Cited

in

State v. Gramm, 7 Wyo. 329, 52 P. 533,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 8

, 40 L.R.A. 690 (1898).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Rights of Way to Mining Claims Across Public Lands,” see 12 Wyo. L.J. 162 (1958).

§ 5. Special privileges prohibited.

Except a preference right to buy as in this constitution otherwise provided, no law shall ever be passed by the legislature granting any privileges to persons who may have settled upon any of the school lands granted to the state subsequent to the survey thereof by the general government, by which the amount to be derived by the sale or other disposition of such lands, shall be diminished directly or indirectly.

One in possession of land under contract to purchase is not liable for taxes

on the land. Olds v. Little Horse Creek Cattle Co., 22 Wyo. 336, 140 P. 1004,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1914).

§ 6. Disposition of unexpended income of perpetual school fund.

If any portion of the interest or income of the perpetual school fund be not expended during any year, said portion shall be added to and become a part of the said school fund.

University permanent land fund was not intended to be confined for use

in payment of current expenses but may, if necessary and proper, be used to erect buildings when authorized by legislature. Arnold v. Bond, 47 Wyo. 236, 34 P.2d 28,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1934).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Controlling the Blue Rash: Issues and Trends in State Land Management,” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1994).

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

For article, “The Rise and Fall of Grazing Reform,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 413 (1997).